Maryland, session 2025, SB0397.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–1306.
(a) This section does not apply to any person riding in an enclosed cab.
(b) (1) [An] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, AN individual may not operate or ride on a motorcycle unless the individual
is wearing protective headgear that meets the standards established by the Administrator.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN INDIVIDUAL AT LEAST
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0397*

SENATE BILL 397
21 YEARS OLD WHO:
(I) HAS BEEN LICENSED TO OPERATE A MOTORCYCLE FOR AT
LEAST 2 YEARS;
(II) HAS COMPLETED A MOTORCYCLE RIDER SAFETY COURSE
APPROVED BY THE ADMINISTRATOR OR THE MOTORCYCLE SAFETY FOUNDATION;
OR
(III) IS A PASSENGER ON A MOTORCYCLE OPERATED BY AN
INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN ITEM (I) OR (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(c) A person may not operate a motorcycle unless:
(1) [He] THE PERSON is wearing an eye–protective device of a type
approved by the Administrator; or
(2) The motorcycle is equipped with a windscreen.
(d) The Administrator:
(1) May approve or disapprove protective headgear and eye–protective
devices required by this section;
(2) May adopt and enforce regulations establishing standards and
specifications for the approval of protective headgear and eye–protective devices; and
(3) Shall publish lists of all APPROVED protective headgear and
eye–protective devices [that he approves], by name and type.
(e) (1) The failure of an individual to wear protective headgear required under
subsection (b) of this section may not:
(i) Be considered evidence of negligence;
(ii) Be considered evidence of contributory negligence;
(iii) Limit liability of a party or an insurer; or
(iv) Diminish recovery for damages arising out of the ownership,
maintenance, or operation of a motorcycle.
(2) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (3) of this subsection, a party,
witness, or counsel may not make reference to protective headgear during a trial of a civil
action that involves property damage, personal injury, or death if the damage, injury, or
death is not related to the design, manufacture, supplying, or repair of protective headgear.

SENATE BILL 397 3
(3) (i) Nothing contained in this subsection may be construed to
prohibit the right of a person to institute a civil action for damages against a dealer,
manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or other appropriate entity or person arising out
of an incident that involves protective headgear alleged to be defectively designed,
manufactured, or repaired.
(ii) In a civil action described under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph in which 2 or more parties are named as joint tort–feasors, interpleaded as
defendants, or impleaded as defendants, and at least 1 of the joint tort–feasors or
defendants is not involved in the design, manufacture, supplying, or repair of protective
headgear, a court shall order on a motion of any party separate trials to accomplish the
ends of justice.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.